District of Columbia statutes.
00a7Repealed00a7
9-1217.28
00a7
Appropriations authorized.
00a7
Repealed.
00a700a7
History
Mar. 10, 1983, D.C. Law 4-201, § 723, 30 DCR 14800a7
Prior Codifications
00a71981 Ed., §§ 7-218, 7-219.00a700a700a7